Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-913
Cowboy Trail Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) There is hereby created the Cowboy Trail Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Money accepted or transferred pursuant to subsection (3) of section 37-912 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.

(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Youth Conservation Program Fund on March 31, 2016, to the Cowboy Trail Fund. The Game and Parks Commission shall use money transferred to the Cowboy Trail Fund under this subsection for the development of undeveloped portions of the Cowboy Trail but shall not expend any money under this subsection unless the amount is matched both by a public entity and by a private entity for each expenditure.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 374;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.